North Carolina statutes. Chapter 156. Drainage.
Article 9. Adjustment of Delinquent Assessments.

§ 156-125.
Adjustment by board of commissioners authorized.

The board of commissioners of any drainage district may, in connection with the issuance of bonds for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds of the district, and in addition to preparing a new assessment roll, for the payment of principal and interest of such refunding bonds, and when the bonds so refunded constitute all of the bonds of the district for which an assessment has been made against property therein, adjust the uncollected delinquent installments of the assessment made upon property in the district, for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds so refunded and for other purposes authorized by law before said bonds were refunded. The adjustment of such delinquent assessments may include reduction of the principal amount of the delinquent installments, not exceeding fifty per centum (50%) thereof, to which reduced installments shall be added interest computed thereon, at a rate not less than the rate of interest of the refunding bonds, from the date of delinquency of said installments to the date of the refunding bonds, and shall include any costs legally incurred for the collection of the same; the date of delinquency shall be deemed to be the first day of December following the date upon which each of said installments became due: Provided, however, all delinquent installments of such assessment shall be adjusted on the same basis and by the same method.

History.

1935, c. 469, s. 1.

§ 156-126.
Extension of adjusted installments.

Upon adjustment of delinquent installments of any assessment as provided herein, the payment of all delinquent installments so adjusted may be extended over a period not exceeding the life of the issue of refunding bonds, but in no event over a period exceeding 20 years. Such extension shall be made by the preparation of assessment rolls, which shall provide for the payment of installments so adjusted in equal annual installments which shall become due annually on September 1, in accordance with the original assessment, and shall bear interest at the rate of four per centum (4%) per annum from December 1 following their due date until paid. Such assessment rolls shall be prepared and filed with the sheriff and the clerk of superior court and receipts shall be prepared and the same shall be collected in the same manner as other assessments of the district.

History.

1935, c. 469, s. 2.

§ 156-127.
Special fund set up; distribution of collections.

The collection of assessments adjusted under this Article and of interest accrued under

G.S. 156-126

shall be set aside in a fund and shall be applied as follows: One third of such collections may be used solely for operating and administrative expenses of the district, but the remaining two thirds thereof shall be reserved as additional security for the payment of the refunding bonds, or for the purchase and retirement of such refunding bonds, at prices not exceeding par and accrued interest.

History.

1935, c. 469, s. 3.

§ 156-128.
Approval of adjustments by Local Government Commission.

Any adjustments of delinquent assessments under the provisions of this Article shall be effective only upon approval of the Local Government Commission.

History.

1935, c. 469, s. 4.

§ 156-129.
Amount of assessments limited; reassessments regulated.

The assessments made under this Article shall in no instance, and against no piece of property, be greater in amount than that percent which the percent assessment authorized by this Article bears to the unpaid original assessment upon each piece or tract of property within the district. In no instance, either under this Article or any other law, shall any reassessment be made upon any piece of property for the purpose of providing money for the same purpose for which the original assessment was made, when the original assessment upon said property has been paid, or shall be paid prior to such general reassessment, nor to the extent that the original assessment has been paid.

History.

1935, c. 469, s. 4(b).